Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1593.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [373.52] NO MANDATES WITHOUT FUNDING. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin County noncompliance allowed. new text end new text begin (a) Except as provided under subdivision 2, a county is not required to comply with a state mandate in paragraph (b) until a state law provides a county with the amount of revenue needed to pay for the mandate. new text end new text begin (b) A state mandate that a county is not required to comply with under paragraph (a) is a mandate that: new text end new text begin (1) affects the daily operation of a county government; new text end new text begin (2) changes the allocation of a county's resources; or new text end new text begin (3) changes a county's spending priorities. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Exceptions. new text end new text begin A county must comply with a state mandate if the amount of revenue needed for compliance is incidental compared to the county's total budget. A county must continue compliance with any law that governs financial audit requirements or that directly affects the safety and health of county residents. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section applies to state mandates that are in effect after June 30, 2025. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin [471.343] NO MANDATES WITHOUT FUNDING. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Municipal noncompliance allowed. new text end new text begin (a) Except as provided under subdivision 2, a municipality is not required to comply with a state mandate in paragraph (b) until a state law provides a municipality with the amount of revenue needed to pay for the mandate. new text end new text begin (b) A state mandate that a municipality is not required to comply with under paragraph (a) is a mandate that: new text end new text begin (1) affects the daily operation of municipal government; new text end new text begin (2) changes the allocation of municipal resources; or new text end new text begin (3) changes a municipality's spending priorities. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Exceptions. new text end new text begin A municipality must comply with a state mandate if the amount of revenue needed for compliance is incidental compared to the municipality's total budget. A municipality must continue compliance with any law that governs financial audit requirements or that directly affects the safety and health of municipal residents. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section applies to state mandates that are in effect after June 30, 2025. new text end